hu: Dugattyú alakja: Harmonika; Tartály; Egyéb
nb: Stempelform: Trekkspill; Kopp; Annet
ru: Форма вантуза: Гармошкой; Чаша; Другой
sk-SK: Tvar piestu: Akordeón; Pohár; Iné
th: รูปร่างลูกสูบ: หีบเพลงชัก; หน้ากากทรง Cup; อื่นๆ
da: Stempelform: Harmonika; Kop; Andet
fr: Forme du piston: Accordéon; Tasse; Autre
zh-TW: 柱塞形狀: 手風琴; 杯型; 其他
pl: Kształt tłoka: Akordeon; Kubek; Inne
sl-SI: Oblika gume za odmaševanje odtokov: Naguban; Klasična; Drugo
en: Plunger shape: Accordion; Cup; Other
tr: Piston şekli: Akordeon; Kap; Diğer
fi: Männän muoto: Harmonikka; Kuppi; Muu
es: Forma del destapacaños: Acordeón; Taza; Otros
zh-CN: 柱塞形状: 手风琴; 杯子; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на бутало: Акордеон; Чаша; Други
ro-RO: Forma pistonului: Acordeon; Cupă; Altele
it: Forma dello sturalavandini: Fisarmonica; Coppa; Altro
nl: Vorm plunjer: Accordion; Kom; Andere
ja: プランジャーの形状: アコーディオン; カップ; その他
cs: Tvar pístu: Akordeon; Šálek; Jiné
ko: 플런저 모양: 아코디언; 컵; 기타
pt-BR: Formato do êmbolo: Acordeão; Copo; Outro
lt-LT: Unitazo pompos forma: Gofruota; Puodelio formos; Kita
hr-HR: Oblik gumenog odčepljivača odvoda: Harmonika; Polukružni; Ostalo
de: Kolbenform: Akkordeon; Cup; Sonstiges
vi: Hình dạng pit tông: Đàn xếp; Cốc; Khác
el: Σχήμα εμβόλου: Ακορντεόν; Κύπελλο; Άλλο
sv: Kolvform: Dragspel; Kopp; Övrigt
pt-PT: Formato de êmbolo: Acordeão; Recipiente; Outro